Hawaii statutes.
[§89E-1] Definitions. For the purposes
of this chapter:

"Actuarial present value" means the
difference in value between a member's benefit reflecting termination of
service without the special retirement provision and the value of the member's
benefit reflecting the special retirement benefit.

"Agency" or "attached
agency" means the Hawaii health systems corporation.

"Directly affected" refers to when an
employee receives official reduction-in-force notification of displacement from
the employee's position because of a senior employee exercising
reduction-in-force rights, or because the employee's position is part of a
workforce restructuring plan, including privatization.

"Employee" means an individual:

(1) Employed by the state government or an attached
agency in a position subject to chapters 88 and 89;

(2) Whose position has been identified for
abolishment or directly affected because of a reduction-in-force or workforce
restructuring plan, including privatization; and

(3) Whose employment is subject to Act 103, Session
Laws of Hawaii 2015.

"Exclusive representative" has the
same meaning as defined in section 89-2.

"Public employer" has the same
meaning as defined in section 89-2.

"Reduction-in-force" includes layoffs
under chapter 89. [L Sp 2016 2d, c 1, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next